Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.030

Technical assistance program—Toolkit.

(1) The center for the improvement of student learning established in RCW 28A.300.130 must implement a language access technical assistance program for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement that meets the requirements of this section.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the language access technical assistance program must:

(a) Adhere to the principles of an effective language access program for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement established in RCW 28A.183.020;

(b) Provide training and technical assistance to support the implementation of language access programs for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement required under *RCW 28A.183.040 and 72.40.310;

(c) Develop and maintain training modules for interpreters on interpreting for students' families and students in educational settings outside the classroom;

(d) Develop, periodically update, and publish a language access toolkit that includes the following resources:

(i) A self-assessment for evaluating the provision of language access services;

(ii) A guide for the development, implementation, and evaluation of a language access policy, procedures, and plan that meets the specific needs of families and the community;

(iii) Best practices for using interpreter services provided by dual role staff and contract interpreters, for using remote interpretation, and for translating documents;

(iv) Language access service evaluation templates for spoken and sign languages;

(v) Information for students' families about their language access rights, translated into English, Spanish, and at least the next nine languages most commonly used by students and their families; and

(vi) Sample job description of school district language access coordinators and building points of contact for language access services;

(e) Develop, periodically update, and publish bilingual glossaries of education terminology;

(f) Analyze and publish language access and language access service information submitted as required under RCW 28A.183.050. In addition to disaggregation by the student race and ethnicity categories and subcategories described in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3), the published information must be disaggregated, to the extent possible, by language, school district and school, type of meeting, and other demographics or categories; and

(g) Provide staff support for the language access advisory committee established in RCW 28A.183.070.

(3) The activities of and resources provided by the language access technical assistance program must take into consideration the recommendations in the 2020 and 2021 reports of the language access work group.

[ 2022 c 107 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 28A.183.040 and 72.40.310 appears to be erroneous. RCW 28A.183.040, 28A.710.400, and 72.40.310 was apparently intended.

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.